Louisiana, session 2026, SB217.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1137(B), 1302, 1312(A), (B), (C), and (D)(1), 1335, 1337(A) and
(B), 1343(A), 1344(A) and (D), 1347(A)(3), (B), and (C), 1383, 1384, 1595, 2151(D),
2151.4(D), 2492(A)(1), (5), and (6) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:1312(E)
and (F), and 2492(A)(8) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1137. Civil district court for the Parish of Orleans; jurisdiction
* * *
B. The court of appeal with jurisdiction over the parish of Orleans has
appellate jurisdiction over all cases tried in the city courts of New Orleans where the
amount in dispute, value of the movable property involved, or fund to be distributed
does not exceed one hundred dollars, exclusive of interest. These appeals shall be
tried de novo by a single judge, and without a jury; however, the Civil District Court
for the Parish of Orleans may provide by rule that no evidence shall be admitted on
the trial de novo which was not offered in the city court unless it is shown to the
satisfaction of the court that despite the exercise of reasonable diligence by the party
offering it such evidence could not have been produced at the trial in the city court.
* * *
§1302. Criers
Page 1 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
The judge of each division of the civil district court shall appoint a crier for
his division who shall be commissioned by the civil sheriff as a deputy sheriff, and
who shall perform such duties as may be provided by law and the rules of the court.
When directed by the court, the crier shall administer the oath required by law of all
witnesses and jurors. Each crier shall receive a compensation payable by the sheriff
of Orleans Parish for service as a bailiff in the same manner as a deputy of
similar experience and any such other amount as the court en banc executive
committee of the judicial expense fund may fix which in any event shall not be less
than three hundred dollars per month, payable out of the judicial expense fund of the
parish of Orleans on the warrant of the judge of the division in which the crier
serves. In addition to the compensation payable to each crier from any source
whatsoever, each crier shall receive additional compensation of one hundred dollars
per month payable by the city of New Orleans, plus additional compensation of two
hundred dollars per month payable by the city of New Orleans when and if funds are
made available therefor. For Fiscal Year 2026-27, the judicial expense fund shall
reimburse the sheriff for the full amount of compensation of criers. Thereafter,
the reimbursement for the compensation of criers shall be subject to an
agreement between the executive committee of the Consolidated Judicial
Expense Fund and the sheriff. Nothing in this Section relieves a sheriff of any
obligation under applicable law, including R.S. 13:5539(B).
* * *
§1312. Judicial expense fund; sources, control, and administration
A. The clerks of the First and Second City Court shall place all sums
collected or received under this Section in a separate account to be designated as the
Judicial Expense Fund for the Civil District Court for the Parish of Orleans. The
judges, en banc, of the Civil District Court for the Parish of Orleans and the First and
Second City Courts of the city of New Orleans The executive committee of the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans shall have control
over the fund and all disbursements made therefrom. They shall cause to be
conducted annually an audit of the fund and the books and accounts relating thereto,
Page 2 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
and shall file the audit with the office of the legislative auditor where it shall be
available for public inspection.
B. The judges of the Civil District Court for the Parish of Orleans and the
First and Second City Courts of the city of New Orleans, sitting en banc, executive
committee of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans
shall have control over the judicial expense fund for the parish of Orleans, accruing
and accrued, and to this end shall fix and regulate from time to time the number of
deputies and employees of the offices of the clerks of the City Courts and their
expenses, and also shall have the power to fix the tariff of costs and charges to be
paid for official services in the offices, which are paid into, and constitute the fund;
due publication of which tariff, when made, shall be given. They shall have power
to determine whether any amounts from the fund shall be devoted to the expense or
payment of taking testimony by shorthand and to regulate and provide for the same.
The judges are authorized to contribute out of the fund, to the embellishment,
maintenance, improvement or repair, or both, of each courtroom, the courthouse
itself or its furnishings, or both, and may contribute to any pension, retirement
system and group hospitalization plans to which officers and employees paid out of
the fund may belong.
C. The judges, en banc, executive committee of the Consolidated Judicial
Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans may further appoint such secretarial,
clerical, research, administrative, or other personnel as they deem necessary to
expedite the business and function of the court and fix and pay all or any part of the
salaries of such personnel out of the monies in the judicial expense fund. In like
manner, the judges, en banc, executive committee of the Consolidated Judicial
Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans may utilize the monies in the judicial
expense fund to pay all or any part of the cost of establishing or maintaining, or both,
a law library for the court, or for buying or maintaining, or both, any type of
equipment, supplies, or other items consistent with or germane to the efficient
operation of the court. In general, the judicial expense fund is established and may
be used for any purpose or purposes connected with, incidental to, or related to the
Page 3 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
proper administration or function of the said court or the offices of the individual
judges and is in addition to any and all other funds, salaries, expenses, or other
monies that are now or hereafter provided, authorized, or established by law for any
of the aforesaid purposes.
D.(1) The judges, en banc, executive committee of the Consolidated
Judicial Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans may utilize the monies in the
judicial expense fund to pay all or any part of the cost of planning, designing, and
constructing a new courthouse for the parish of Orleans, which shall house the
following courts and all related support offices:
(a) Civil District Court.
(b) First and Second City Courts.
(c) Juvenile Courts.
* * *
E. All funds collected pursuant to R.S. 22:822(B)(3) or that would
otherwise be deposited in the Judicial Expense Fund for Criminal District Court
as provided for in R.S. 13:1381.4 shall instead be deposited into the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for Orleans Parish as created pursuant to
this Section.
F. The executive committee of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund
for Orleans Parish shall be comprised of the following members: two judges
appointed by the civil district court judges; two judges appointed by the
criminal district court judges; one judge appointed by the city court judges; and
two sitting and two retired judges appointed by the supreme court. The
executive committee shall have the authority to govern the fund.
§1335. Criminal district court for the parish of Orleans
A. There shall be one criminal district court for the parish of Orleans, which
shall be composed of twelve nine judges.
B.(1) Divisions A, E, and J of the Criminal District Court for the parish
of Orleans shall be abolished in accordance with this Section.
(2) No qualifying shall be opened for any successor to a judgeship that
Page 4 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
is abolished pursuant to this Subsection, and no election shall be held for any
judgeship abolished pursuant to this Subsection.
* * *
§1337. Appellate and supervisory jurisdiction; writs
A. The Criminal District Court Court of appeal with jurisdiction for the
Parish of Orleans shall have appellate jurisdiction of all cases tried before the
Municipal Court of New Orleans and the Traffic Court of New Orleans. Appeals
from the municipal and traffic courts shall be on the law and the facts and shall be
tried upon the records made and the evidence offered in said courts by the judge to
whom the appeal shall be allotted. In all cases tried before the judges of the criminal
district court in which an appeal does not lie to the supreme court, an appeal shall lie
on questions of law and fact to two or more of the judges of the criminal district
court, as prescribed by said court. The criminal district court shall adopt rules
regulating the manner of taking and hearing and deciding such appeals.
B. The Criminal District Court Court of appeal with jurisdiction for the
Parish of Orleans shall have general supervisory jurisdiction over the municipal and
traffic courts of New Orleans and shall have authority to issue writs of habeas corpus
in criminal cases, as well as such other writs and orders as are necessary in aid of the
jurisdiction of the court.
* * *
§1343. Allotment of cases among judges; holding of preliminary examination not
ground for recusation
A. All cases pending in the criminal district court shall be allotted equally
among Sections A, B, C, D, E, F, G, H, I, J, K, and L the divisions of the court.
Except on Sundays, legal holidays, and legal half-holidays, the allotment of cases
shall be made public by classes daily at noon by the clerk or a deputy clerk selected
by him, in the presence of the district attorney. The fact the accused was committed
for trial at a preliminary examination shall not be grounds for the recusation of the
trial judge who held the preliminary examination.
* * *
Page 5 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
§1344. Homicide section; Orleans Parish Criminal District Court; assignment of
judges; jurisdiction; transfer of cases; expedited handling of writs and
appeals; applicability of section to other district courts
A. The judges of the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans who
are in office on August 15, 2009, may create the homicide section of that court, by
rule of court adopted by the judges sitting en banc. The rule may designate not less
than one incumbent judge who may be assigned to a homicide section in accordance
with the rules of the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans.
* * *
D. Any homicide section, court, or other special division adopted pursuant
to R.S. 13:587.4 or other authority shall conform to the extent practicable to the
provisions of this Section rules of court provided that the rules and assignments
shall be subject to the general supervisory authority of the supreme court
pursuant to Article V of the Constitution of Louisiana.
* * *
§1347. Commissioners of magistrate section
A. * * *
(3) The judges of the criminal district court, sitting en banc, shall determine
the further powers, duties, functions, and policy affecting the offices of
commissioner, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Section provided that the
rules shall be subject to general supervision of the supreme court pursuant to
Article V of the Constitution of Louisiana. Unless otherwise provided by any
rule adopted by the court in accordance with this Paragraph, the commissioners
shall have the same authority for cases within the jurisdiction of the Orleans
Criminal Court as a commissioner pursuant to R.S. 13:713, including the
authority to make a report and recommendation to the judges concerning
claims for post-conviction relief by the incarcerated.
(4) The salaries of commissioners may be optionally supplemented by the
city of New Orleans or the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the parish
of Orleans, as determined by its executive committee, provided that total
Page 6 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
compensation in accordance with this Section shall not exceed that for a
commissioner pursuant to R.S. 13:713.
B. The initial appointments by the governor of the three commissioners
created in R.S. 13:1347, Act No. 548 of the 1974 Regular Session of the Louisiana
Legislature, are hereby approved, confirmed, ratified, continued, validated, and
affirmed and said appointment shall be for a term of six years from the date thereof
shall appoint a nominating committee of five members to vet and recommend
future commissioners.
C. Should there be a vacancy created by the removal, resignation or death of
any commissioner of the four commissioners, the judges of the criminal district
court sitting en banc shall fill the vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term
from a list provided by the nominating committee as provided for in Subsection
B of this Section. At the termination of the initial term and or any subsequent terms
of a commissioner, the judges of the criminal district court sitting en banc shall
appoint successors to the office for like terms from a list provided by the
nominating committee as provided for in Subsection B of this Section. All
commissioners are subject to removal for any reason for which a judge of the
criminal district court may be removed from office. Such removal shall be by order
of the judges of the criminal district court sitting en banc, upon recommendation
of the nominating committee after notice and hearing, and shall be subject to
review by the Supreme Court of Louisiana in the same manner as if the removal
was recommended by the Judiciary Commission. Nothing in this Section shall
divest the Judiciary Commission of concurrent jurisdiction to recommend
discipline of commissioners. No one shall serve in the office of commissioner
unless he has practiced law in the state of Louisiana for a period of not less than five
years. Commissioners shall be allowed to practice civil law but shall not engage in
the practice of criminal law.
* * *
§1383. Sections; court buildings
There shall be ten nine separate sections of Criminal District Court for the
Page 7 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
Parish of Orleans, designated as Sections A through J L subject to the provisions
of R.S. 13:1335 or other applicable law. Each shall be presided over by one of the
judges. The judges shall hold court in one building to be provided by the city of New
Orleans.
§1384. Criminal district courts; office or positions and functions
Each criminal district court in the parish of Orleans shall have a position or
office of judicial administrator, deputy judicial administrator, and assistants, at least
thirteen law clerks, and at least four secretaries and law clerks and secretaries for
each section at amounts approved by the executive committee of the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the parish of Orleans, and shall provide
for the conduct of the jury commission and sanity hearings, the cost of all of which
shall be appropriated in the appropriation bill which provides for judicial expenses
and shall be allocated by the Judicial Budgetary Control Council to such court. The
amount necessary in excess of the amount appropriated may be charged on the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund or otherwise, when already required by
law, shall be paid by the parish of Orleans.
* * *
§1595. Judges; criers and stenographers
A. In addition to Sections "A", "B", and "C" of the Juvenile Court for the
Parish of Orleans, there is hereby created a new section of the court to be designated
as Section "D". The additional judge created by this Section shall be known as the
judge of Section "D" of the Juvenile Court for the Parish of Orleans. Each judge shall
have the right to appoint a crier and stenographer for his own section of the court,
who shall perform the same duties and receive the same compensation, payable in
the same manner and from the same sources as similar officials in other sections of
the court. The judge of Section "D" of the juvenile court shall be elected by the
voters of Orleans Parish concurrently with the next election for mayor of the city of
New Orleans.
B. The judgeship created for Section "D" of the Juvenile Court for the parish
of Orleans shall be abolished effective December 31, 2014, at midnight.
Page 8 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
C.B. The first judgeship becoming vacant by death, resignation, retirement,
or removal during the term of office of any of the other Sections after January 1,
2027, shall be abolished at midnight of such day. If any incumbent judge is
prohibited from serving in office at the commencement of the next term due to
the provisions of Article V, Section 23 of the Constitution of Louisiana, that
section shall be considered as vacant by retirement solely for the purposes of
this Subsection as of the end of that term and no qualifying shall be opened for
a successor if that seat is the judgeship that is required to be abolished pursuant
to this Subsection at the end of that term of office.
D.C.(1) Upon the abolishment of a judgeship as provided for in Subsections
Subsection B and or C of this Section, the funding from the city of New Orleans for
such judgeship shall be allocated for improved juvenile services within the city of
New Orleans.
(2) The judges, en banc, may appoint a hearing officer in the same
manner as any district court or may appoint a commissioner to perform duties
in accordance with the rules of the court as prescribed by the elected judges that
are in accordance with the Louisiana Constitution and do not exceed authority
otherwise provided for in the law for a hearing officer or commissioner in a
district court in the state. Nothing in this Section shall require additional
appropriation from the city of New Orleans without its consent.
* * *
§2151. Sections of first city court; election of judges; presiding judge; jurisdiction
* * *
D. The civil jurisdiction is concurrent with the district court in cases where
the amount in dispute, as defined in Code of Civil Procedure Article 4841(B), or the
value of the property involved, does not exceed twenty fifty thousand dollars.
* * *
§2151.4. Second City Court; judge; clerk; constable; jurisdiction
* * *
D. The civil jurisdiction is concurrent with the district court in cases where
Page 9 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
the amount in dispute, as defined in Code of Civil Procedure Article 4841(B), or the
value of the property involved, does not exceed twenty-five fifty thousand dollars.
* * *
§2492. Number of judges; qualifications; election; salary; vacation
A. (1)The Municipal and Traffic Court of New Orleans shall consist of eight
judgeships through December 31, 2020. Thereafter Until January 1, 2027, it shall
consist of seven judgeships. Thereafter it shall consist of five judgeships.
* * *
(5) Division "H" and the judgeship for Division "H" shall be abolished
December 31, 2020, effective at midnight. Divisions "B" and "F" and the
judgeships for Divisions "B" and "F" shall be abolished on December 31, 2026,
effective at midnight. The other divisions shall remain unchanged as previously
designated Divisions "A" through "G".
(6) A vacancy in Divisions "A", through "C", "D", "E", and "G" shall be
filled by election to that division as provided in this Section.
* * *
(8) Excluding the judgeships provided for in Paragraph (5) of this
Subsection and notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection, the first
judgeship becoming vacant by death, resignation, retirement, or removal of any
division after December 31, 2026, shall be abolished at midnight of such day. If
any incumbent judge is prohibited from serving in office at the commencement
of the next term due to the provisions of Article V, Section 23 of the
Constitution of Louisiana, that division shall be considered as vacant by
retirement solely for the purposes of this Paragraph as of the end of that term
and no qualifying shall be opened for a successor if that seat is the judgeship
that is required to be abolished pursuant to this Paragraph.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 13:1304, 1347(D), (F), and (G), 1595.1, and 2492(A)(7)(b) are hereby
repealed.
Section 3. Any judge and the related division otherwise abolished pursuant to this
Page 10 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 217 ENROLLED
Act shall remain in effect only to the end of the current term of office. No provision of this
Act shall deprive any judge in office of the ability to serve the entire remainder of his current
unexpired term of office. To effectuate the provisions of this Act, no further elections shall
be held for any judgeship abolished pursuant to the provisions of this Act, including for any
division repealed under either Section 1 or 2 of this Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.